Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.200

Indebtedness—Bonds.

The legislative authority of any county is hereby authorized for the purpose of carrying out the lawful powers granted by this chapter to contract indebtedness and to issue and sell general obligation bonds pursuant to and in the manner provided for general county bonds in chapters 36.67 and 39.46 RCW and other applicable statutes; and to issue revenue bonds pursuant to and in the manner provided for revenue bonds in chapter 36.67 RCW and other applicable statutes. The county legislative authority may also issue local improvement district bonds in the manner provided for cities and towns.

[ 1984 c 186 s 35; 1983 c 167 s 101; 1981 c 313 s 2; 1967 c 72 s 20.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Severability—1981 c 313: See note following RCW 36.94.020.